notebooks/Latvian.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
        +N      ! Noun tag
        +Sg     ! Singular
        +Pl     ! Plural
        +Nom
        +Gen
        +Dat
        +Acc
        +Loc

!Define root lexicon
LEXICON Root
  Nouns ; ! No input, no output

!Define noun lexicon
LEXICON Nouns
  kūk N4dekl ;
  paziņ N4dekl ;
  mašīn N4dekl ;

  kartupel N2dekl ;
  džemper N2dekl ;
  kām N2dekl;

  salāt N1dekl ;
  gald N1dekl ;
  zēn N1dekl ;


! Define 4th declension paradigm
LEXICON N4dekl
+N+Sg+Nom:^a  # ;
+N+Sg+Gen:^as # ;
+N+Sg+Dat:^ai # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:^u # ;
+N+Sg+Loc:^ā # ;
+N+Pl+Nom:^as  # ;
+N+Pl+Gen:^u  # ;
+N+Pl+Dat:^ām # ;
+N+Pl+Acc:^as # ;
+N+Pl+Loc:^ās # ;

! Define 2th declension paradigm
LEXICON N2dekl
+N+Sg+Nom:^is  #;
+N+Sg+Gen:^Ma  #;
+N+Sg+Dat:^im #;
+N+Sg+Acc:^i #;
+N+Sg+Loc:^ī #;
+N+Pl+Nom:^Mi  #;
+N+Pl+Gen:^Mu  #;
+N+Pl+Dat:^Miem #;
+N+Pl+Acc:^Mus #;
+N+Pl+Loc:^Mos #;

! Define 1th declension paradigm
LEXICON N1dekl
+N+Sg+Nom:^s  # ;
+N+Sg+Gen:^a # ;
+N+Sg+Dat:^am # ;
+N+Sg+Acc:^u # ;
+N+Sg+Loc:^ā # ;
+N+Pl+Nom:^i  # ;
+N+Pl+Gen:^u  # ;
+N+Pl+Dat:^iem # ;
+N+Pl+Acc:^us # ;
+N+Pl+Loc:^os # ;
